Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
APPROVAL BY THIRD PERSONS AND
TERMINATING MEMBERS OR REDEEMING OR
CANCELING MEMBERSHIPS

7-130-301. Approval by third persons.

The articles of incorporation may require an amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws to be approved in writing by a stated person or persons other than the board of directors. Such a provision may only be amended with the approval in writing of such person or persons.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 712, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2345, § 317, effective July 1, 2004.

7-130-302. Amendment terminating members or redeeming or canceling memberships.

Any amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a nonprofit corporation that would terminate all members or any class of members or redeem or cancel all memberships or any class of memberships shall meet the requirements of articles 121 to 137 of this title and this section.

Before adopting a resolution proposing an amendment as described in subsection (1) of this section, the board of directors of a nonprofit corporation shall give notice of the general nature of the amendment to the members.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 713, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.